North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
The member has acquired from the employer such certifications of temporary employment as are required by the Board of Trustees.The amount of creditable service purchased under this subsection may not exceed a total of five years. A member shall purchase
this service by making a lump sum payment into the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation
of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced
retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative
fee to be set by the Board.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer,
the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

, (u) Repealed by Session Laws 2020-29, s. 1(a), effective June 19, 2020.

(v) Omitted Membership Service. — A member who had service as an employee as defined in

G.S. 135-1(10)

and

G.S. 128-21(10)

or as a teacher as defined in

G.S. 135-1(25)

and who was omitted from contributing membership through error may be allowed membership service, after submitting clear and convincing evidence of the error, as follows:

Within 90 days of the omission, by the payment of employee and employer contributions that would have been paid; or

After 90 days and prior to three years of the omission, by the payment of the employee and employer contributions that would have been paid plus interest compounded annually at a rate equal to the greater of the average yield on the pension accumulation
fund for the preceding calendar year or the actuarial investment rate-of-return assumption, as adopted by the Board of Trustees; or

After three years of the omission, by the payment of an amount equal to the full cost of the service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the system’s liabilities, and shall take into account
the additional retirement allowance arising on account of such additional service credit commencing at the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance, as determined by the Board of
Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subdivision that provide for the purchase of service credits,
the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire
on an unreduced service allowance.Nothing contained in this subsection shall prevent an employer or member from paying all or a part of the cost of the omitted membership service; and to the extent paid by the employer,
the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund; and to the extent paid by the member, the cost paid by the members shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account; provided, however,
an employer does not discriminate against any member or group of members in his employ in paying all or any part of the cost of the omitted membership service.

(w) (Repealed effective July 1, 2022) Credit at Full Cost for Federal Employment. — Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter, a member in service with five or more years of membership service may purchase creditable service for periods of
federal employment, provided that the member is not receiving any retirement benefits resulting from this federal employment, and provided that the member is not vested in the particular federal retirement system to
which the member may have belonged while a federal employee. The amount of creditable service purchased under this subsection may not exceed a total of five years. The member shall purchase this service by making a
lump sum amount payable to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the
liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced
retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an
administrative fee to be set by the Board.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is
paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s
annuity savings account.On or before December 31, 2021, members in service may also purchase creditable service for periods of employment with public community service entities within the State funded entirely with
federal funds, other than the federal government, that are not covered by the provisions of

G.S. 128-21(11)

or

G.S. 135-1(11)

, under the same terms and conditions that are applicable to the purchase of creditable service for periods of federal employment in accordance with this subsection. “Public community service entities”
as used in this subsection shall mean community action, human relations, manpower development, and community development programs as defined in Articles 19 and 21 of Chapter 160A and Article 18 of Chapter 153A of the
General Statutes.

(x) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 32.32(c), effective July 1, 2001.

(y) A member who is a beneficiary of the Disability Income Plan provided for in Article 6 of this Chapter shall be granted creditable service for each month that the member is eligible for and for which a benefit is paid under the provisions of

G.S. 135-105

and

G.S. 135-106

; provided, however, that in no instance shall a member be granted creditable service under this subsection if creditable service is earned or credited for the same month in this retirement system
or any other retirement system administered by the State.

(z) Credit at Full Cost for Leave Due to Extended Illness. — Any member in service with five or more years of membership service may purchase creditable service for periods of interrupted service while on leave without pay status due to the member’s illness
or injury, excluding leave due to maternity, provided that any single such interrupted service shall have included such period of time during which the member failed to earn at least two months membership service, by
making a lump sum amount payable to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation
of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on
an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also
include an administrative fee to be set by the Board. The amount of creditable service purchased under this subsection may not exceed a total of five years.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer
may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund.
To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

(aa) Credit at Full Cost for Parental Leave, Pregnancy or Childbirth-Related Leave, or Certain Involuntary Furloughs. — Notwithstanding other provisions of this Chapter, any member in service with five or more years of credited membership service may
purchase creditable service for periods of service which were interrupted due to parental leave, pregnancy or childbirth, or involuntary administrative furlough due to a lack of funds to support the position by making
a lump sum amount payable to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the
liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced
retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an
administrative fee to be set by the Board. The amount of creditable service purchased under this subsection may not exceed a total of five years.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all
or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent
that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

(bb) (Repealed effective July 1, 2022) Credit at Full Cost for Probationary Local Government Employment Purchased On or Before December 31, 2021. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, on or before December 31, 2021, a member may purchase
creditable service, prior to retirement, for employment with any local employer as defined in

G.S. 128-21(11)

when considered to be in a probationary or employer-imposed waiting period status, between the date of employment and the date of membership service with the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement
System, provided that the former employer of such a member has revoked this probationary employment or waiting period policy.The member shall purchase this service by making a lump-sum amount payable to the Annuity
Savings Fund equal to the full liability of the service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the retirement system, and the calculation
of the amount payable shall take into account the retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credit commencing at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance,
as determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection that provide for the
purchase of service credits, the term “full liability” includes assumed annual postretirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced
service allowance.

(bb1) Credit at Full Cost for Probationary Local Government Employment Purchased On and After January 1, 2022. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, on and after January 1, 2022, a member may purchase creditable service, prior to retirement,
for employment with any local employer as defined in G.S. 128-21(11) when considered to be in a probationary or employer-imposed waiting period status, between the date of employment and the date of membership service
with the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.The member shall purchase this service by making a lump sum amount payable to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional
service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the
allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees
upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all
or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent
that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

(cc) Credit for Employment in a Charter School Operated by a Private Nonprofit Corporation or a Charter School Operated by a Municipality. — Prior to January 1, 2023, any member may purchase creditable service for any employment as an employee of a charter
school operated by a private nonprofit corporation or a charter school operated by a municipality whose board of directors did not elect to participate in the Retirement System under

G.S. 135-5.3

upon completion of five years of membership service by making a lump-sum payment into the Annuity Savings Fund. The payment by the member shall be equal to the full liability of the service credits
calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for purposes of the actuarial valuation of the Retirement System’s liabilities, taking into account the additional retirement allowance arising on account of the additional
service credits commencing at the earliest age at which the member could retire with an unreduced retirement allowance, as determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the actuary plus an administrative expense
fee to be determined by the Board of Trustees. Creditable service purchased under this subsection shall not exceed a total of five years. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for
the purchase of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual postretirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest
age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

(cc1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, on and after January 1, 2023, any member in service with five or more years of membership service may purchase creditable service for any employment as an employee of a charter school
operated by a private nonprofit corporation or a charter school operated by a municipality whose board of directors did not elect to participate in the Retirement System under

G.S. 135-5.3

by paying a total lump sum payment. The amount of creditable service purchased under this subsection may not exceed a total of five years. The member shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum
amount to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the
Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance
and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of
the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that the
purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

(dd) Purchase of Service Credits Through Rollover Contributions From Certain Other Plans. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who
is eligible to restore or purchase membership or creditable service pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 135-4

, may, subject to such rules and regulations established by the Board of Trustees, purchase such service credits through rollover contributions to the Annuity Savings Fund from (i) an annuity contract
described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code which is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality
of a state or political subdivision of a state, (iii) an individual retirement account or annuity described in Section 408(a) or 408(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is eligible to be rolled over and would otherwise
be includible in gross income, or (iv) a qualified plan described in Section 401(a) or 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Retirement System shall not accept any amount as a rollover
contribution unless such amount is eligible to be rolled over to a qualified trust in accordance with applicable law and the member provides evidence satisfactory to the Retirement System that such amount qualifies
for rollover treatment. Unless received by the Retirement System in the form of a direct rollover, the rollover contribution must be paid to the Retirement System on or before the 60th day after the date it was received
by the member.

Purchase of Service Credits Through Plan-to-Plan Transfers. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who is eligible to restore or purchase
membership or creditable service pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 135-4

, may, subject to such rules and regulations established by the Board of Trustees, purchase such service credits through a direct transfer to the Annuity Savings Fund of funds from (i) an annuity contract
described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code or (ii) an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Code which is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of
a state or political subdivision of a state.

(ee) Purchase of Service Credits Through Plan-to-Plan Transfers. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who is eligible to restore or
purchase membership or creditable service pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 135-4, may, subject to such rules and regulations established by the Board of Trustees, purchase such service credits through a direct transfer
to the Annuity Savings Fund of funds from (i) the Supplemental Retirement Income Plans A, B, or C of North Carolina or (ii) any other defined contribution plan qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code which is maintained by the State of North Carolina, a political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state.

(ff) Retroactive Membership Service. — A member who is reinstated to service as an employee as defined in

G.S. 135-1(10)

or as a teacher as defined in

G.S. 135-1(25)

retroactively to the date of prior involuntary termination with back pay, as defined by the State Human Resources Commission, and associated benefits may be allowed membership service, after submitting
clear and convincing evidence of the reinstatement, payment of back pay, and restoration of associated benefits, as follows:

(1) When the reinstatement to service is by court order, final decision of an Administrative Law Judge, or with the approval of the Office of State Human Resources Director, and is:

Within 90 days of the involuntary termination, by the payment of employee and employer contributions that would have been paid; or

After 90 days of the involuntary termination, by the payment of the employee and employer contributions that would have been paid plus interest compounded annually at a rate equal to the greater of the average yield on the pension accumulation fund for
the preceding calendar year or the actuarial investment rate-of-return assumption, as adopted by the Board of Trustees.

(2) When the reinstatement to service is by settlement agreement voluntarily entered into by the affected parties, by the payment of a lump-sum amount. The member shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum amount to the annuity savings fund equal
to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the
following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual
postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board.Subject
to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the
employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account; provided,
however, that an employer does not discriminate against any employed member or group of employed members in paying all or any part of the cost of the retroactive membership service.In the event a member received
a return of accumulated contributions subsequent to an involuntary termination as provided in G.S. 135-5(f), the member may redeposit, within 90 days after reinstatement retroactive to the date of prior involuntary
termination, in the annuity savings fund by single payment an amount equal to the total amount the member previously withdrew plus regular interest and restore the creditable service forfeited upon receiving
the return of accumulated contributions.

(gg) If a member who is an elected government official and has not vested in this System on July 1, 2007, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-18.10

for acts committed after July 1, 2007, then that member shall forfeit all benefits under this System, except for a return of member contributions plus interest. If a member who is an elected
government official and has vested in this System on July 1, 2007, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-18.10

for acts committed after July 1, 2007, then that member is not entitled to any creditable service that accrued after July 1, 2007, regardless of whether that creditable service was earned
by virtue of membership in the System, accrued by conversion of sick leave at the point of the member’s retirement, accrued by transfer of service from another retirement system, purchased by the member in accordance
with this Chapter, or accrued by any other means. No member shall forfeit any benefit or creditable service earned from a position not as an elected government official. For purposes of this subsection, creditable
service attributable to the conversion of sick leave accrues in this System on the date of retirement, service transferred to this System from another system accrues in this System on the effective date of the
transfer, and purchased service accrues in this System on the date of the purchase.

(hh) Credit at Full Cost for Service With The University of North Carolina During Which a Member Participated in the Optional Retirement Program. — Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter to the contrary, any member in service with five or
more years of membership service may purchase creditable service for periods of employment with The University of North Carolina during which the member participated in the Optional Retirement Program as provided
for in

G.S. 135-5.1

, provided that the member is not receiving, and is not entitled to receive, any retirement benefits resulting from this employment. The amount of creditable service purchased under this
subsection may not exceed a total of five years. The member shall purchase this service by making a lump-sum amount payable to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional
service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation:
(i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the
Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board.Subject to the requirements of this subsection,
an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension
accumulation fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

(ii) If a member who is in service and has not vested in this System on December 1, 2012, is convicted of an offense listed in G.S. 135-18.10A for acts committed after December 1, 2012, then that member shall forfeit all benefits under this System, except
for a return of member contributions plus interest. If a member who is in service and has vested in this System on December 1, 2012, is convicted of an offense listed in G.S. 135-18.10A for acts committed after
December 1, 2012, then that member is not entitled to any creditable service that accrued after December 1, 2012, regardless of whether that creditable service was earned by virtue of membership in the System,
accrued by conversion of sick leave at the point of the member’s retirement, accrued by transfer of service from another retirement system, purchased by the member in accordance with this Chapter, or accrued
by any other means. For purposes of this subsection, creditable service attributable to the conversion of sick leave accrues in this System on the date of retirement, service transferred to this System from
another system accrues in this System on the effective date of the transfer, and purchased service accrues in this System on the date of the purchase.

(jj) (Effective until July 1, 2022) Contribution-Based Benefit Cap Purchase Provision. — If a member’s retirement allowance is subject to an adjustment pursuant to the contribution-based benefit cap established in G.S. 135-5(a3), the retirement system
shall notify the member and the member’s employer that the member’s retirement allowance has been capped. The retirement system shall compute and notify the member and the member’s employer of the total additional
amount the member would need to contribute in order to make the member not subject to the contribution-based benefit cap. This total additional amount shall be the actuarial equivalent of a single life annuity
adjusted for the age of the member at the time of retirement, or when appropriate, the age at the time of the member’s death that would have had to have been purchased to increase the member’s benefit to the
pre-cap level. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the member shall have until 90 days after notification regarding this additional amount or until 90 days after the effective date of retirement,
whichever is later, to submit a lump sum payment to the annuity savings fund in order for the retirement system to restore the retirement allowance to the uncapped amount. Nothing contained in this subsection
shall prevent an employer from paying all or part of the cost of the amount necessary to restore the member’s retirement allowance to the pre-cap amount. Notwithstanding the requirement that the payment be made
as a lump sum, the retirement system may allow an employer of a member who became a member before January 1, 2015, or who has not earned at least five years of membership service in the retirement system after
January 1, 2015, to pay the lump-sum amount required in this subsection on an installment payment plan under one of the following two options:

(1) Option one. — An installment payment plan ending no more than 15 months after the retirement of the member.

(2) Option two. — An installment payment plan ending no more than 27 months after the retirement of the member. Interest shall be assessed on the principal amount of the contribution-based benefit cap liability owed and applied to any installment payment
plan term exceeding 12 months at a rate corresponding with the interest rate assumption based on the most recent actuarial valuation approved by the Board of Trustees.Payment under both installment plans must
be completed regardless of whether the member continues to receive a recurring monthly retirement benefit through the end of the installment period.

(jj) (Effective July 1, 2022) Contribution-Based Benefit Cap Purchase Provision. — If a member’s retirement allowance is subject to an adjustment pursuant to the contribution-based benefit cap established in G.S. 135-5(a3), except as otherwise provided
under this subsection, the retirement system shall notify the member and the member’s employer that the member’s retirement allowance has been capped. The retirement system shall compute and notify the member
and the member’s employer of the total additional amount the member would need to contribute in order to make the member not subject to the contribution-based benefit cap. This total additional amount shall
be the actuarial equivalent of a single life annuity adjusted for the age of the member at the time of retirement, or when appropriate, the age at the time of the member’s death that would have had to have been
purchased to increase the member’s benefit to the pre-cap level. If the member’s employer did not report to the retirement system any compensation paid to the member during the period used to compute the member’s
average final compensation, the retirement system shall not notify the member’s employer, but instead shall notify the employer or employers who reported compensation during the member’s average final compensation
period, with the notification for each such employer specifying that employer’s share of the amount that would have had to have been purchased to increase the member’s benefit to the pre-cap level, allocated
proportionally to each employer based on the total amount of compensation to the member that each employer reported during the period used to compute the member’s average final compensation. Except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, the member shall have until 90 days after notification regarding this additional amount or until 90 days after the effective date of retirement, whichever is later, to submit a lump
sum payment to the annuity savings fund in order for the retirement system to restore the retirement allowance to the uncapped amount. Nothing contained in this subsection shall prevent an employer or former
employer from paying all or part of the cost of the amount necessary to restore the member’s retirement allowance to the pre-cap amount. Notwithstanding the requirement that the payment be made as a lump sum,
and notwithstanding Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the retirement system may allow an employer or former employer of a member who became a member before January 1, 2015, or who has not earned at least
five years of membership service in the retirement system after January 1, 2015, to pay the additional amount required in this subsection over an extended period using one of the following three options:

(1) Option one. — An installment payment plan ending no more than 15 months after the retirement of the member.

(2) Option two. — An installment payment plan ending no more than 27 months after the retirement of the member. Interest shall be assessed on the principal amount of the contribution-based benefit cap liability owed and applied to any installment payment
plan term exceeding 12 months at a rate corresponding with the interest rate assumption based on the most recent actuarial valuation approved by the Board of Trustees.

(3) Option three. — An adjustment to the required employer contribution rate for the employer as provided in G.S. 135-8(f)(5).Payment under the selected option must be completed regardless of whether the member continues to receive a recurring monthly
retirement benefit through the end of the extended payment period. An employer’s continuing compliance with a payment option selected from the three options above will be deemed payment of the employer’s additional
contribution required by this subsection for purposes of G.S. 135-8(f)(3).

History.
1941, c. 25, s. 4; 1943, cc. 200, 783; 1945, c. 797; 1947, c. 575; 1949, c. 1056, ss. 2, 4; 1953, c. 1050, s. 3; 1959, c. 513, s. 11/2; 1961, c. 516, s. 3; c. 779, s. 2; 1963, c. 1262; 1965, c. 780, s. 1; c. 924; 1967, c.
720, s. 3; 1969, c. 1223, ss. 3, 4; 1971, c. 117, ss. 9, 10; c. 993; 1973, c. 241, s. 2; c. 242, s. 1; c. 667, s. 2; c. 737, s. 1; c. 816, s. 1; c. 1063; c. 1311, ss. 1-5; 1975, c. 205, s. 2; c. 875, s. 47; 1977, cc. 317, 790; 1979,
c. 826; c. 866, s. 2; c. 867; c. 972, s. 3; 1981, c. 557, s. 3; c. 636, s. 1; c. 1116, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1396, s. 4; 1983, c. 533, s. 1; c. 725; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1030; c. 1034, ss. 230, 231; c. 1045, ss.
1, 2; 1985, c. 401, ss. 1, 2; c. 407, s. 1; c. 479, s. 193; c. 512; c. 530; c. 649, ss. 1, 4; c. 749, s. 1; 1987, c. 533, s. 1; c. 717, s. 2; c. 738, s. 29(b); c. 809, s. 2; c. 821; c. 825; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1088, ss. 1-4;
c. 1103; c. 1110, s. 9; 1989, c. 255, ss. 11-20; c. 762, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1017, s. 2; c. 1029, s. 1; 1995, c. 507, s. 7.23D(b); 1998-71, ss. 3, 4; 1998-190, s. 1; 1998-212, s. 9.14A(c); 1998-214, s. 2; 1999-71, s.
1; 1999-158, s. 2; 2001-424, ss. 32.28(a), 32.32(a), 32.32(b), 32.32(c); 2002-71, s. 5; 2002-153, s. 4; 2002-174, s. 3; 2003-284, s. 30.18(b); 2003-358, s. 3; 2003-359, ss. 7, 8, 9, 12.; 2005-91, s. 1; 2007-179, s. 3(b); 2007-233,
s. 1; 2007-431, ss. 8, 11; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-72, s. 5(a); 2011-183, s. 101; 2011-294, s. 5(a); 2012-130, s. 3(b), (c); 2012-193, s. 2; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2013-405, s. 6(a); 2014-88, s. 1(c); 2014-115, s. 55.3(f); 2015-67, s. 6;
2015-168, s. 7(a); 2016-82, s. 1; 2017-128, s. 2(a); 2017-129, s. 9(a); 2018-85, ss. 7, 14; 2018-145, s. 20(b); 2020-29, s. 1(a); 2020-48, s. 4.4(a), (b); 2021-57, ss. 1.1, 1.2(a), (b), 1.3, 1.4(a); 2021-72, ss. 1.1(d), 3.1(d).

Certain Municipalities Authorized to Establish and Operate Charter Schools.

Session Laws 2018-3, authorized municipalities in the Towns of Cornelius, Huntersville, Matthews, and Mint Hill to establish and operate charter schools.